Illinois, session 104th, SB2156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-2.5-105 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-105 new)7    Sec. 3-2.5-105. Child First Reform Task Force.8    (a) The Child First Reform Task Force is created. The 9purpose of the Task Force is to review and study the current 10state of juvenile detention centers across the State. The Task 11Force shall consider the conditions and administration of 12individual juvenile detention centers, identify the resources 13needed to consistently meet the minimum standards set by the 14Department of Juvenile Justice and the Administrative Office 15of the Illinois Courts, evaluate complaints arising out of 16juvenile detention centers, identify best practices to provide 17detention center care, propose community-based alternatives to 18juvenile detention, and advise on the creation of the Youth 19Advisory Agency with youth justice advisors and district youth 20advisory offices in each circuit court district. The Task 21Force shall also make recommendations for policy changes at 22the Department of Juvenile Justice to support child-first 23directives aligned with the policies and practices established   SB2156 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1in the Convention on the Rights of the Child that was adopted 2by the United Nations General Assembly on November 20, 1989, 3and became effective as an international treaty on September 42, 1990.5    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:6        (1) A member of the Senate appointed by the President 7    of the Senate.8        (2) A member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 9    Leader of the Senate.10        (3) A member of the House appointed by the Speaker of 11    the House.12        (4) A member of the House appointed by the Minority 13    Leader of the House.14        (5) A member appointed by the Director of Juvenile 15    Justice.16        (6) A member appointed by the Director of Human 17    Rights.18        (7) A member appointed by the Independent Juvenile 19    Ombudsperson.20        (8) A member appointed by the Independent Juvenile 21    Ombudsperson who represents an organization that advocates 22    for a community-based rehabilitation or systems impacted 23    individuals.24        (9) A member appointed by the Independent Juvenile 25    Ombudsperson who represents an organization that advocates 26    for juvenile justice reform.  SB2156 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1        (10) Two members appointed by the Illinois Juvenile 2    Justice Commission.3        (11) A member appointed by the Director of the 4    Governor's Office of Management and Budget.5        (12) One member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor 6    who is a member of a county board of a county operating a 7    county detention facility.8        (13) One member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor 9    who is a juvenile detention officer, probation officer, or 10    other facility employee at a county detention facility who 11    makes the determination on whether to detain a juvenile at 12    the county detention facility. 13        (14) A member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor 14    from the Justice, Equity, and Opportunity Initiative. 15        (15) Two members appointed by the Director of Juvenile 16    Justice who are over the age of 18 and who have served any 17    amount of time in a county juvenile detention facility.18        (16) A member appointed by the Director of the 19    Illinois State Police.20        (17) A member appointed by the Secretary of Human 21    Services. 22    The Task Force may include 2 additional members appointed 23by the Illinois Supreme Court. 24    (c) Appointments to the Task Force shall be made within 90 25days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 26104th General Assembly. Members shall serve without   SB2156 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1compensation.2    (d) The Task Force shall meet at the call of a co-chair at 3least quarterly to fulfill its duties. The members of the Task 4Force shall select 2 co-chairs from among themselves at their 5first meeting.6    (e) The Task Force shall:7        (1) engage community organizations, interested groups, 8    and members of the public for the purpose of assessing:9            (A) community-based alternatives to detention and 10        the adoption and implementation of such alternatives;11            (B) the needs of juveniles detained in county 12        detention facilities;13            (C) strategic planning for a transition away from 14        juvenile detention facilities;15            (D) the establishment of more accountability 16        between county facilities and the Department of 17        Juvenile Justice, or if there would be a benefit for 18        the State in operating detention centers for persons 19        awaiting sentencing or court determination, in lieu of 20        counties providing this service, when in extreme cases 21        the county detention center is unable to pass minimum 22        standards        ;23            (E) evidence-based best practices regarding the 24        delivery of services within detention centers, 25        including healthcare and education;26            (F) the integration of restorative practices into   SB2156 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1        the juvenile detention system, focusing on healing, 2        accountability, and community restoration;3            (G) the implementation of child-first directives 4        within the Department of Juvenile Justice and 5        throughout the State;6            (H) strategic planning for creating a Youth 7        Advisory Agency with district youth advisory offices 8        in each circuit court district;9            (I) the implementation of youth justice advisors 10        within the Youth Advisory Agency to guide juveniles 11        through the juvenile justice process, including 12        through interactions with law enforcement, the courts, 13        and community-based alternatives to detention;14            (J) how county juvenile detention facilities are 15        currently funded;16            (K) how to encourage the Illinois Supreme Court 17        and relevant authorities to require, as a consistent 18        part of continuing education, training on child-first 19        directives, child rights, and the unique needs of 20        minors in the justice system; and21            (L) the establishment of training requirements by 22        the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 23        for law enforcement on child-first directives, child 24        rights, and the unique needs of minors in the justice 25        system; 26        (2) review available research and data on the benefits   SB2156 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1    of community-based alternatives to detention versus the 2    benefits of juvenile detention;3        (3) review Administrative Office of the Illinois 4    Courts, Department of Juvenile Justice, and Independent 5    Ombudsperson monitoring reports to identify specific 6    instances of non-compliance arising out of county juvenile 7    detention facilities and patterns of noncompliance 8    Statewide; and9        (4) make recommendations or suggestions for changes to 10    the County Shelter Care and Detention Home Act and the 11    Unified Code of Corrections, including changes and 12    improvements to the juvenile detention system.13    (f) On or before January 1, 2026, the Task Force shall 14publish a final report of its findings and non-binding 15recommendations. The report shall, at a minimum, detail 16findings and recommendations related to the duties of the Task 17Force and the following:18        (1) the process and standards used to determine 19    whether a juvenile will be detained in a county facility;20        (2) information and recommendations on detention 21    facility standards, including how to ensure compliance 22    with minimum standards, which facilities are chronically 23    noncompliant and the reasons for noncompliance, including 24    specific instances of noncompliance, and penalties for 25    noncompliance;26        (3) strategic planning suggestions to transition away   SB2156 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1    from juvenile detention;2        (4) how county juvenile detention facilities are 3    currently funded;4        (5) recommendations on whether to establish more 5    accountability between county facilities and the 6    Department of Juvenile Justice, or whether the operation 7    of all detention centers should be transferred to the 8    Department of Juvenile Justice;9        (6) how to incorporate restorative practices into the 10    juvenile justice system;11        (7) implementing child-first directives throughout the 12    State;13        (8) strategic planning suggestions on creating a Youth 14    Advisory Agency with youth justice advisors and district 15    youth advisory offices in each circuit court district;16        (9) recommendations on the duties of youth justice 17    advisors and the role they will serve in assisting 18    juveniles through the juvenile justice process, including 19    through interactions with law enforcement, the courts, and 20    community-based alternatives to detention, and 21    recommendations on how many youth justice advisors to 22    staff for each circuit court district;23        (10) strategic planning suggestions to encourage the 24    Illinois Supreme Court and relevant authorities to 25    require, as a consistent part of continuing education, 26    training on child-first directives, child rights, and the   SB2156 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 10595 RLC 20671 b1    unique needs of minors in the justice system; and2        (11) strategic planning to require the Illinois Law 3    Enforcement Training Standards Board to establish training 4    for law enforcement on child-first directives, child 5    rights, and the unique needs of minors in the justice 6    system. 7    The final report shall be submitted to the General 8Assembly, the Offices of the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, 9the Chief Judge of each circuit court operating a county 10detention facility, the county board of each county operating 11a county detention facility, and the Office of the Attorney 12General.13    (g) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide 14administrative support for the Task Force.15    (h) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.  16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.